North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Article 8. Financing Agreements and Other Financing Arrangements.

§ 159-148.
Contracts subject to Article; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this Article applies to any contract, agreement, memorandum of understanding, and any other transaction having the force and effect of a contract (other than agreements made in connection with the issuance of revenue bonds, special obligation bonds issued pursuant to Article 7A of this Chapter, or of general obligation bonds additionally secured by a pledge of revenues) made or entered into by a unit of local government (as defined by G.S. 159-7(b) or, in the case of a special obligation bond, as authorized in

G.S. 159-146

), relating to the lease, acquisition, or construction of capital assets, which contract does all of the following:

Extends for five or more years from the date of the contract, including periods that may be added to the original term through the exercise of options to renew or extend.

Obligates the unit to pay sums of money to another, without regard to whether the payee is a party to the contract.

Obligates the unit over the full term of the contract, including periods that may be added to the original term through the exercise of options to renew or extend:

For baseball park districts, to at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

For housing authorities, to at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or a sum equal to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per housing unit owned and under active management by the housing authority, whichever is less.

For other units, to at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or a sum equal to one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of the assessed value of property subject to taxation by the contracting unit, whichever is less.

Obligates the unit, expressly or by implication, to exercise its power to levy taxes either to make payments falling due under the contract, or to pay any judgment entered against the unit as a result of the unit’s breach of the contract.Contingent obligation shall be included in calculating the value of the contract. Several contracts that are all related to the same undertaking shall be deemed a single contract for the purposes of this Article. When several contracts are considered as a single contract, the term shall be that of the contract having the longest term, and the sums to fall due shall be the total of all sums to fall due under all single contracts in the group.

This Article shall not apply to:

Contracts between a unit of local government and the State of North Carolina or the United States of America (or any agency of either) entered into as a condition to the making of grants or loans to the unit of local government.

Contracts for the purchase, lease, or lease with option to purchase of motor vehicles or voting machines.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.30(g), effective retroactively to July 1, 2019.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 31; 1989, c. 756, s. 6; 1991, c. 11, s. 4; 1997-380, s. 4; 1998-222, s. 1; 2001-206, s. 2; 2001-414, s. 52; 2020-3, s. 4.30(g).

Local Modification.

Mecklenburg County: 2009-162, s. 1(c).

§ 159-149.
Application to Local Government Commission for approval of contract.

A unit of local government may not enter into any contract subject to this Article unless it is approved by the Local Government Commission as evidenced by the secretary’s certificate thereon. Any contract subject to this Article that does not bear the secretary’s certificate thereon shall be void, and it shall be unlawful for any officer, employee, or agent of a unit of local government to make any payments of money thereunder. Before executing a contract subject to this Article, the governing board of the contracting unit shall file an application for Commission approval of the contract with the secretary of the Commission. The application shall state such facts and have attached to it such documents concerning the proposed contract and the financial condition of the contracting unit as the secretary may require. The Commission may prescribe the form of the application.

Before he accepts the application, the secretary may require the governing board or its representatives to attend a preliminary conference at which time the secretary and his deputies may informally discuss the proposed contract.

After an application in proper form and order has been filed, and after a preliminary conference if one is required, the secretary shall notify the unit in writing that the application has been filed and accepted for submission to the Commission. The secretary’s statement shall be conclusive evidence that the unit has complied with this section.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-150.
Sworn statement of debt; debt limitation.

After or at the time an application is filed under

G.S. 159-149

, the finance officer, or some other officer designated by the board, shall prepare, swear to, and file with the secretary and for public inspection in the office of the clerk to the board a statement of debt in the same form prescribed in

G.S. 159-55

for statements of debt filed in connection with general obligation bond issues. The sums to be included in gross debt and the deductions therefrom to arrive at net debt shall be the same as prescribed in

G.S. 159-55

, except that sums to fall due under contracts subject to this Article shall be treated as if they were evidenced by general obligation bonds of the unit.

No contract subject to this Article may be executed if the net debt of the contracting unit, after execution of the contract, would exceed eight percent (8%) of the assessed value of property subject to taxation by the contracting unit.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1991, c. 11, s. 5.

§ 159-151.
Approval of application by Commission.

In determining whether a proposed contract shall be approved, the Commission may consider:

Whether the undertaking is necessary or expedient.

The nature and amount of the outstanding debt of the contracting unit.

The unit’s debt management procedures and policies.

The unit’s tax and special assessments collection record.

The unit’s compliance with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

Whether the unit is in default in any of its debt service obligations.

The unit’s present tax rates, and the increase in tax rate, if any, necessary to raise the sums to fall due under the proposed contract.

The unit’s appraised and assessed value of property subject to taxation.

The ability of the unit to sustain the additional taxes necessary to perform the contract.

If the proposed contract is for utility or public service enterprise, the probable net revenues of the undertaking to be financed and the extent to which the revenues of the utility or enterprise, after addition of the revenues of the undertaking to be financed, will be sufficient to meet the sums to fall due under the proposed contract.

Whether the undertaking could be financed by a bond issue, and the reasons and justifications offered by the contracting unit for choosing this method of financing rather than a bond issue.

The Commission shall have authority to inquire into and to give consideration to any other matters that it may believe to have bearing on whether the contract should be approved.

The Commission shall approve the application if, upon the information and evidence it receives, it finds and determines:

That the proposed contract is necessary or expedient.

That the contract, under the circumstances, is preferable to a bond issue for the same purpose.

That the sums to fall due under the contract are adequate and not excessive for its proposed purpose.

That the unit’s debt management procedures and policies are good, or that reasonable assurances have been given that its debt will henceforth be managed in strict compliance with law.

That the increase in taxes, if any, necessary to meet the sums to fall due under the contract will not be excessive.

That the unit is not in default in any of its debt service obligations.

The Commission need not find all of these facts and conclusions if it concludes that (i) the proposed project is necessary and expedient, (ii) the proposed undertaking cannot be economically financed by a bond issue and (iii) the contract will not require an excessive increase in taxes.If the Commission tentatively decides to deny the application because it cannot be supported from the information presented to it, it shall so notify the unit filing the information. If the unit so requests, the Commission shall hold a public hearing on the application at which time any interested persons shall be heard. The Commission may appoint a hearing officer to conduct the hearing and to present a summary of the testimony and his recommendation for the Commission’s consideration.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 32.

§ 159-152.
Order approving or denying the application.

After considering an application, and conducting a public hearing thereon if one is requested under

G.S. 159-151

, the Commission shall enter its order either approving or denying the application. An order approving an application shall not be regarded as an approval of the legality of the contract in any respect.

If the Commission enters an order denying an application, the proceedings under this Article shall be at an end.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-153.
Approval of other financing arrangements.

Commission Approval Required. — Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, approval by the Commission in accordance with this section is required before a unit of local government, or any public body, agency, or similar entity created by any action of a unit of local government, may do any of the following:

Incur indebtedness.

Enter into any similar type of financing arrangement.

Approve or otherwise participate in the incurrence of indebtedness or the entering into of a similar type of financing arrangement by another party on its behalf.

(a1)

Nonprofit Water Corporation. —

A loan from the Water Infrastructure Fund to a nonprofit water corporation, as defined in

G.S. 159G-20

, is subject to approval by the Commission under this section.

(a2)

Investor-Owned Drinking Water Corporation. —

A loan from the DWSRF, an account within the Water Infrastructure Fund, to an investor-owned drinking water corporation, as defined in

G.S. 159G-20

, is subject to approval by the Commission under this section.

Exceptions. — Approval by the Commission in accordance with this section is not required in any of the following cases:

Another law of this State already specifically requires Commission approval of the indebtedness or financing arrangement and the required approval is obtained in accordance with that law.

The indebtedness or financing arrangement is a contract entered into by a unit of local government pursuant to

G.S. 160A-20

and is not subject to review by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 160A-20

(e).

The indebtedness or financing arrangement is excepted from the review requirements of this Article because it does not meet the conditions of G.S. 159-148(a)(1) or (3) or because it is excluded pursuant to G.S. 159-148(b).

Effect of Special Act. — No special, local, or private act shall be construed to create an exception from the review of the Commission required by this section unless the act explicitly excludes the review and approval of the Commission.

Factors Considered. — The Commission may consider all of the following factors in determining whether to approve the incurrence of, entering into, approval of, or participation in any indebtedness or financing arrangement subject to approval pursuant to this section:

Whether the undertaking is necessary or expedient.

The nature and amount of the outstanding debt of the entity proposing to incur the indebtedness or enter the financing arrangement.

Whether the entity proposing to operate the facilities financed by the indebtedness or financing arrangement and the entity obligating itself under the indebtedness or financing arrangement have demonstrated or can demonstrate the financial responsibility and capability to fulfill their obligations with respect to the indebtedness or financing arrangement. In making this determination, the Commission may consider the operating entity’s experience and financial position, the nature of the undertaking being financed, and any additional security such as insurance, guaranties, or property to be pledged to secure the indebtedness or financing arrangement.

Whether the proposed date and manner of sale of obligations will have an adverse effect upon any scheduled or anticipated sale of obligations by the State or any political subdivision or by any agency of either of them.

The local government unit’s debt management procedures and policies.

The local government unit’s compliance with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

Whether the local government unit is in default in any of its debt service obligations.

Documentation. — To facilitate the review of the proposed indebtedness or financing arrangement by the Commission, the Secretary may require the unit or other entity to obtain and submit any financial data and information about the proposed indebtedness or financing arrangement and security for it, including any proposed prospectus or offering circular, the proposed financing arrangement and security document, and annual and other financial reports and statements of the obligated entity. Applications and other documents required by the Commission must be in the form prescribed by the Commission.

Conditions for Approval. — If the Commission determines that all of the following conditions are met, the Commission shall approve the incurrence of the indebtedness, entering of the financing arrangement, or approval or other participation in the indebtedness or financing arrangement, by the unit of local government or the other entity referred to in subsection (a) of this section:

The amount of the indebtedness to be incurred or financed is not excessive for the purpose contemplated.

The entity that will operate the facilities financed by the indebtedness or financing arrangement and the entity obligating itself under the indebtedness or financing arrangement have demonstrated or can demonstrate the financial responsibility and capability to fulfill their obligations with respect to the indebtedness or financing arrangement.

The proposed date and manner of sale of obligations will not have an adverse effect upon any scheduled or anticipated sale of obligations by the State or any political subdivision or any agency of either of them.

History.

1998-222, s. 2; 1999-213, s. 11; 2005-454, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 13.11A(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-454, s. 10, effective January 1, 2006, rewrote subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.11A(e), effective July 1, 2011, added subsection (a2).

§§ 159-154 through 159-159.

Reserved for future codification purposes.